Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3210
Real estate mortgage; purchase of stock in federal corporation; court may authorize.

When any court of competent jurisdiction shall issue a license to any trustee, executor, administrator or guardian to execute a real estate mortgage, such court may authorize the trustee, executor, administrator or guardian to purchase stock in any association or corporation created or which may be created by authority of the United States and as an instrumentality of the United States when such purchase of stock is necessary or required as an incident to obtaining such loan; Provided, the amount of stock which may be purchased shall be limited to the amount of stock required for the proposed loan.

Laws 1935, c. 68, § 2, p. 246;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 27-604;

R.S.1943, § 24-603;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-603.